src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON VSBST-ODD
         +N+Sg+Nom:%>   K                   ;
      +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>   R                   ;
      +N+Cmp/SgGen:%>a  R                   ;
      +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij R                   ;
                +N:%>   OTH-ODDCASE_Px_flag ;
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes:»    AHTES               ;

LEXICON VSBST-ODD-PL
       +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>      R                   ;
       +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij    R                   ;
!                +N:%>      OTH-ODDCASE_Px_flag ;
  +N+Der4+Der/ahtes:»       AHTES               ;
             +N+Ess:in      K                   ;
          +N+Pl+Nom:a       K                   ;
          +N+Pl+Gen:ij      K                   ;
          +N+Pl+Gen:ij%>    PxCs                ; !
          +N+Pl+Acc:ijt     K                   ;
          +N+Pl+Acc:ijd%>   PxCs                ; !
          +N+Pl+Ill:ijda    K                   ;
          +N+Pl+Ill:ijdas%> PxC                 ; !
          +N+Pl+Ine:ijn     K                   ;
          +N+Pl+Ine:ijn%>   PxCs                ; !
          +N+Pl+Ela:ijs     K                   ;
          +N+Pl+Ela:ijst%>  PxCs                ; !
          +N+Pl+Com:ij      K                   ;
          +N+Pl+Com:ij%>    PxCs                ; !
          +N+Pl+Abe:ij#dagi K                   ;
          +N+Pl+Abe:ij#dagá K                   ;
          +N+Pl+Abe:ij#tagá K                   ;

LEXICON VSBST-EVEN
                 +N+Sg+Nom:ibme%>   K                    ;
                 +N+Sg+Nom:ibme%>   PxV                  ;
              +N+Cmp/SgNom:im%>     R                    ;
              +N+Cmp/SgGen:ime%>    R                    ;
              +N+Cmp/PlGen:imi%>j   R                    ;
!                   +N+Ess:ibme%>Q1 K                    ; !This is actio essive not NomAct derivation essive.
                    +N+Ess:ibme%>n  K                    ;
                        +N:ibme%>X4 ILL-EVENCASE         ;
                        +N:ibme%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
  	     +N+Der4+Der/ahtes:»        AHTES                ; ! Problematic - not all words pointing to this lexicon is ok with -ahtes, although many are
                        +N:ibme%>   DenominalNounsMUORRA ; !Diminutive and double dim


LEXICON VSBST-EVENTV  !+CmpN/SgN +CmpN/DefSgGen +CmpN/DefPlGen +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft
 +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft: VSBST-EVENTVCT ;

LEXICON VSBST-EVENTVCT
              +N+Cmp/SgNom:im%>     R              ;
              +N+Cmp/SgGen:ime%>    R              ;
              +N+Cmp/PlGen:imi%>j   R              ;
                 +N+Sg+Nom:ibme%>   K              ;
                 +N+Sg+Nom:ibme%>   PxV            ;
                        +N:ibme%>X4 ILL-EVENCASE   ;
                        +N:ibme%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
!                   +N+Ess:ibme%>Q1 K              ; !This is actio essive not NomAct derivation essive.
                    +N+Ess:ibme%>n  K              ;
  		 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes:»        AHTES          ;

LEXICON MUJTATJIBME !+CmpN/SgN +CmpN/DefSgGen +CmpN/DefPlGen +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft
 +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft: MUJTATJIBMECT ;

LEXICON MUJTATJIBMECT
     +N+Sg+Nom:ibme%>   K              ;
     +N+Sg+Nom:ibme%>   PxV            ;
  +N+Cmp/SgNom:im%>     R              ;
  +N+Cmp/SgGen:ime%>    R              ;
  +N+Cmp/PlGen:imi%>j   R              ;
!       +N+Ess:ibme%>Q1 K              ; !This is actio essive not NomAct derivation essive.
        +N+Ess:ibme%>n  K              ;
            +N:ibme%>X4 ILL-EVENCASE   ;
            +N:ibme%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;

LEXICON BEGATJIBME
     +N+Sg+Nom:ibme%>   K              ;
     +N+Sg+Nom:ibme%>   PxV            ; !
  +N+Cmp/SgNom:im%>     R              ; !No compounds for these, but now reintroduced
  +N+Cmp/SgGen:ime%>    R              ;
  +N+Cmp/PlGen:imi%>j   R              ;
!       +N+Ess:ibme%>Q1 K              ; !This is actio essive not NomAct derivation essive.
        +N+Ess:ibme%>n  K              ;
            +N:ibme%>X4 ILL-EVENCASE   ;
            +N:ibme%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;

LEXICON MUS
    +Sg+Nom:%>  K          ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>  R          ;
           :a%> MUSSA_flag ;
LEXICON MUSSA_flag
 @P.Px.add@ MUSSA ;

LEXICON MUSSA
         +Sg+Nom:      PxV                   ;
      +Cmp/SgGen:      R                     ;
      +Cmp/PlGen:j     R                     ;
            +Ess:n     K                     ;
                :Q1    N-EVENWEAKSTEM-OTH    ;
                       ILL-EVENCASE          ;
                :Q1    N-EVENWEAKSTEM-SG-COM ;
 +Der4+Der/ahtes:»Q1g  AHTES                 ;
            +Abe:Q1dak K                     ;
            +Abe:Q1da  K                     ;

LEXICON ACTOR ! bårre ulmusj> bårre is not attr to ulmusj it's a determiner.
!                             +A+Attr:%>Y6 ATTR           ;
                             +N+NomAg:%>Y6 NE-EVENCASE    ;
                             +N+NomAg:%>Y6 ACTORILL       ;
                             +N+NomAg:%>Y6 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
  +N+NomAg+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:%>Y6 ACTORCmp       ; !

LEXICON ACTORTV  !+CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft
! +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+A+Attr:%>Y6 ATTR           ;
       +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:%>Y6 NE-EVENCASE    ;
       +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:%>Y6 ACTORILL       ;
       +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:%>Y6 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
       +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:%>Y6 ACTORCmp       ;

LEXICON ACTORder
!                       +A+Attr:Y6 ATTR           ;
                             +N:Y6 NE-EVENCASE    ;
                             +N:Y6 ACTORILL       ;
                             +N:Y6 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
  +N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:Y6 ACTORCmp       ; !

LEXICON ACTORTVder  !+CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft
! +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+A+Attr:Y6 ATTR           ;
       +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:Y6 NE-EVENCASE    ;
       +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:Y6 ACTORILL       ;
       +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:Y6 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
       +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:Y6 ACTORCmp       ;

LEXICON ACTORILL
 +Sg+Ill:X4j   K    ;
 +Sg+Ill:X4s%> PxCi ; !

LEXICON ACTORdiehtet
! +A+Attr:%>   ATTR            ;
       +N:%>Q7 NE-EVENCASE     ;
       +N:%>Q7 ACTORILLdiehtet ;
       +N:%>Q7 N-EVENWEAKSTEM  ;
       +N:%>   ACTORCmp        ;

LEXICON ACTORILLdiehtet
 +Sg+Ill:X4j   K    ;
 +Sg+Ill:X4s%> PxCi ; !

LEXICON BOAHTEM
         +N+Sg+Nom:%>   K                   ;
      +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>   R                   ;
      +N+Cmp/SgGen:%>a  R                   ;
      +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij R                   ;
                +N:%>   OTH-ODDCASE_Px_flag ;
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes:»    AHTES               ;
