src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
bahájuonagahttem+Sem/Semcon:bahá#juonagahttem VSBST-ODD ;
bekkadiddje+Sem/Cat:bekkadiddje ACTOR ; ! 
belutjåhtålibme+Sem/Dummytag:belut#jåhtål VSBST-EVEN ;
boarrásijæjvvalibme+Sem/Act:boarrásij#æjvval VSBST-EVEN ;
boavtjohållam+Sem/Dummytag:boavtjo#hållam VSBST-ODD ;
buojmudiddje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:buojmudiddje ACTOR ;
dahppanibme+Sem/Dummytag:dahppan VSBST-EVEN ;
diehppebuoktje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:diehppe#buoktje ACTOR ;
diehtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum:diehtte ACTORdiehtet ; ! 
diskontierim+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Act:diskonterim VSBST-ODD ;
doalvodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Act:doalvod VSBST-EVEN ;
dálkudiddje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum:dálkudiddje ACTOR ;
dåbddåm+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Domain:dåbddåm VSBST-ODD ;
fásstudibme+Sem/Act:fásstud VSBST-EVEN ;
gasskatjiektje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum:gasska#tjiektje ACTOR ;
gielladiehtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:giella#diehtte ACTORdiehtet ;
giellalávggom+Sem/Act:giella#lávggom VSBST-ODD ;
gilpustalle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gilpustalle ACTOR ;
guládallam+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Domain:guládallam VSBST-ODD ;
guojmmeoahppe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:guojmme#oahppe ACTOR ;
guovsojvuolastibme+Sem/Time:guovsoj#vuolast VSBST-EVEN ;
gáhpustallam+Sem/Dummytag:gáhpustallam VSBST-ODD ;
gájkdiehtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gájk#diehtte ACTORdiehtet ;
gåbdudakgirdde+Sem/Veh:gåbdudak#girdde ACTOR ;
hierggegilposvuodjem+Sem/Event:hiergge#gilpos#vuodjem VSBST-ODD ;
hávddádibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Act:hávddád VSBST-EVEN ;
iesskiálgge+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:iesski#álgge ACTOR ;
jiednabáddim+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Act:jiedna#báddim VSBST-ODD ;
jårggålibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Prod-ling:jårggål VSBST-EVEN ; ! 
loahppatjiektjama+Sem/Dummytag:loahppa#tjiektjam VSBST-ODD-PL ;
lågådallam+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Dummytag:lågådallam VSBST-ODD ;
lågådiddje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum:lågådiddje ACTOR ;
låhpadibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Dummytag:låhpad VSBST-EVEN ;
nammadibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Act:nammad VSBST-EVEN ;
oadem+Sem/Dummytag:oadem VSBST-ODD ;
oahppobagádalle+Sem/Dummytag:oahppo#bagádalle ACTOR ;
ruhtajuogadibme+Sem/Dummytag:ruhta#juogad VSBST-EVEN ;
ráfájduhttem+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Dummytag:ráfájduhttem VSBST-ODD ;
rájddotjiektjama+Sem/Act:rájddo#tjiektjam VSBST-ODD-PL ;
sebrudakdiehtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sebrudak#diehtºte ACTORdiehtet ;
sebrudakoassálasste+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sebrudak#oassálasste ACTOR ;
skåvllååvddånibme+Sem/Process:skåvllå#åvddån VSBST-EVEN ;
skåvvim+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Act:skåvvim VSBST-ODD ;
stáhtadiehtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:stáhta#diehtte ACTORdiehtet ;
suolagálvvovuobdde+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:suola#gálvvo#vuobdde ACTOR ; ! GG
tjuovggagåvvåvuosedibme+Sem/Act:tjuovgga#gåvvå#vuosed VSBST-EVEN ;
tjálle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:tjálºle ACTOR ; ! 
valástallam+Sem/Dummytag:valástallam VSBST-ODD ;
vokállaoanedibme+Sem/Dummytag:vokálla#oaned VSBST-EVEN ;
vuostasjgierdejienastiddje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum:vuostasj#gierde#jienastiddje ACTOR ;
válggarahtjam+Sem/Dummytag:válgga#rahtjam VSBST-ODD ;
ájáduslådalibme+Sem/Prod-cogn:ájádus#lådal VSBST-EVEN ;
ássjediehtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ássje#diehtte ACTORdiehtet ;
ådåboahtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:ådå#boahtte ACTOR ;
ålgusmáksem+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Dummytag:ålgus#máksem VSBST-ODD ;
åskeldibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Domain:åskeld VSBST-EVEN ;
